src/abbr-sme-lex.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2 
! or any later version.

! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 4 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON Abbreviation
        ITRAB ;     
        TRNUMAB ;
        TRAB ;  
        NOAB ; 

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
 ab-nodot ;
 ab-dot ;

! Some of these POS
!LEXICON ab-noun-adj
! ab-noun ;
! ab-adj ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj
 ab-dot-noun ;
 ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun
 ab-nodot-noun ;
 ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj
 ab-nodot-adj ;
 ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv
 ab-nodot-adv ;
 ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num
 ab-nodot-num ;
 ab-dot-num;

!still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-cc
!ab-nodot-cc ;
!ab-dot-cc ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk 
 +ABBR+N+Attr:%> # ;    ! no period, that is. 
 +ABBR+N+Nom:%> # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Acc:%> # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Gen:%> # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Ill:%>%:i # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Loc:%>%:s # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Com:%>%:in # ; ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Ess:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+N+Ill:%>%:ii # ; ! no period, that is. !SUB
 +ABBR+N+Loc:%>%:as # ; ! no period, that is. !SUB
 +ABBR+N+Com:%>%:ain # ;! no period, that is. !SUB
 +ABBR+N+Ess:%>%:an # ; ! no period, that is. !SUB
 +ABBR+N:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
!+ABBR:%> # ;           ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Attr:%> # ;    ! no period, that is. 
 +ABBR+A+Nom:%> # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Acc:%> # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A+Gen:%> # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+A:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
! +ABBR:%> # ;          ! no period, that is.
  +ABBR+Adv:%> # ;      ! Adv without case, consider this.
! +ABBR+Adv+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
! +ABBR+Adv+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv:%>%- RAbbr ;
 
  LEXICON ab-nodot-num
!+ABBR:%> # ;           ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num+Nom:%> # ;   ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num+Acc:%> # ;   ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num+Gen:%> # ;   ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Num:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-nodot-cc
! +ABBR+CC:%> # ;       ! no period, that is. 

LEXICON ab-nodot      ! default
!+ABBR:%> # ;           ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Attr:%> # ;      ! no period, that is. 
 +ABBR+Nom:%> # ;       ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Acc:%> # ;       ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Gen:%> # ;       ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot        ! Default
 +ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-noun   ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +ABBR+N+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +ABBR+N+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Gen:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Ill:%.%>%:i # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Loc:%.%>%:s # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Com:%.%>%:in # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Ess:%.%>%:n # ; 
 +ABBR+N+Ill:%.%>%:ii # ;  !SUB
 +ABBR+N+Loc:%.%>%:as # ;  !SUB
 +ABBR+N+Com:%.%>%:ain # ; !SUB
 +ABBR+N+Ess:%.%>%:an # ;  !SUB
 +ABBR+N:%>%- RAbbr ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N. 

LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+A+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +ABBR+A+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+A+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+A+Gen:%.%> # ; 
 
LEXICON ab-dot-adv     ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
  +ABBR+Adv:%.%> # ;     ! Adv without case.
 
LEXICON ab-dot-num     ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Num+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Num+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Num+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-cc
 +ABBR+CC:%.%> # ;  


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
 ab-dot-verb ;
 ab-nodot-verb ;
 ab-dot-IVprfprc ;

LEXICON ab-dot-verb
 +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt:%.%>   # ; ! Period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-verb 
 +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt:%>    # ; ! No period.
! # ;
 
! riegádan:

LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc 
 +ABBR+V+IV+PrfPrc:%.%>   # ; ! Period.
 
 

  
! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON NOAB
! This class contains homonyms, which are both intransitive 
! abbreviations and normal words. The abbreviation usage
! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
! the sentnece can be considered as true cases.

du        ab-dot-noun ; !dualis


! ============================================================ !
!      Abreviations who are transitive in front of numerals    !
! ============================================================ !

LEXICON ITRAB
3p         ab ;    !^C^                    !
ab^str     ab-adj ;
adv        ab-noun ;
affekt     ab ;
all        ab-noun ;
anat        ab-dot-adj ; !anatomalaš    !
att        ab ;
can    ab-dot-noun ;
ie    ab-nodot-noun ;
kons    ab-dot-noun ;
vt		ab-nodot-noun ;
lix    ab-nodot-noun ;
med    ab-dot-noun ;
mp   ab-nodot-noun ;
M.J    ab-dot ;
oss    ab-dot-noun ;
pp    ab-dot-noun ;
sch    ab-nodot-noun ;
st.dieđ    ab-dot-noun ;
biol        ab-dot-adj ;              
bot        ab-dot-adj ;               
Bq      ab-nodot-noun ;               
c        ab ; !^C^                         
c/o             ab-nodot ;    !^C^    
ca        ab-dot ;                        !
can$        ab-nodot ;    !^C^            !
et        ab-nodot ;               !
cea        ab-dot-noun ;                   !
cm        ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
co2        ab-nodot-noun ;
C% U% L8R ab-nodot ;                    !
d        ab ;                            ! !^C^
daa        ab-nodot ;                      !
dB        ab-nodot ;                      !
dg        ab-nodot ;                      !
dm2        ab-nodot-noun ;
dub        ab-dot ;
duor        ab-nodot-noun ; !Duorastat
parl ab-dot-noun ;
dis        ab-nodot-noun ; !disdat
e        ab ;                            ! !^C^
etc        ab-dot-adv ;                    !
fac        ab ;                            !
Fim        ab-nodot ; !SUB
fin        ab ;
sis#dávda#osd    ab-dot-noun ;
fuom:fuom9        ab ;
dii.oahp        ab-dot-noun ;
geogr        ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas  !
geom        ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger        ab-dot ;
gl.rs        ab-dot ;                    !
guovl        ab-dot-noun ;               !
h        ab ;                            ! !^C^
ha         ab-nodot ;
hg        ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
ib:ib9        ab-nodot ;                      !
ibid:ibid9    ab-nodot ;                  !
ID        ab-nodot-noun ;
imp        ab-noun ;
impf        ab ;
instr        ab ;
interr:interr9        ab-dot-adj ;
intr        ab-dot-adj ;
j.d    ab-dot ;                            !
j.v    ab-dot-adv ;
jd    ab-dot ;                            !
jk1        ab-nodot ;
jk2        ab-nodot ;
jna        ab-adv ; !ja nu ain             !
jnv        ab-adv ;                        !
journ        ab-dot ;
jur        ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš      !
Kbh     ab-nodot-noun ;
km2        ab-nodot-noun ;
wo        ab-nodot ;
kom:kom9        ab ;
kond        ab ;
konkr        ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
kV        ab-nodot ;
kvm        ab-nodot ;
kW        ab-nodot-noun ;
lm        ab-nodot ;
lok        ab-dot-noun ; !lokatiiva
Muf        ab-noun ; !Musikk i Finnmark
m.fl        ab-dot ;
matem        ab-dot-adj ; !matematihkalaš
mg        ab-nodot-noun ;
milj    ab-num ;
miljo    ab-dot-num ;
mill    ab-num ; !This is used also with dot
mm²        ab-nodot-noun ;
mrd    ab-num ;
mV    ab-nodot ;
mW    ab-nodot ;
m²        ab-nodot-noun ;
njukč    ab-noun ; !SUB !njukčamánnu
o.Kr    ab-dot-adv ; !Does this exist?
o.s    ab-dot ;
oKr    ab-dot-adv ;
ol    ab-dot-noun ; !ovttaidlohku
ovttaj    ab-dot-adj ;
ovttajie       ab-dot-adj ;
ovttajien      ab-dot-adj ;
perf    ab-dot ;
pl    ab-dot ;
prep    ab-dot-noun ;
pres    ab ;
prt        ab ;
prv    ab-dot ;
pvc    ab-nodot ;
refl    ab-adj ;
relat    ab-dot-adj ; !relatiiva
ru    ab ;
ry    ab-noun ;
sg        ab-dot ;
skáb:skáb9        ab-nodot-noun ; !Skábmamánnu
Spd        ab-dot-noun ;                   !
subj        ab-noun ;
uŋgárg        ab-dot-noun ;
UiB ab-nodot-noun ;
vk  ab-nodot ;
áššejođih:áššejođih9    ab-noun ;                       !
č        ab ;                            ! !^C^
k        ab ;                            ! !^C^
o        ab ;                            ! !^C^
q        ab ;                            ! !^C^
u        ab ;                            ! !^C^
y        ab ;                            ! !^C^
LEXICON TRNUMAB
Aut        ab-nodot ;
bie        ab-dot ;
Pb              ab-noun ; ! Postbox 
Rg        ab-nodot ;
Tess:Tess9        ab-noun ;
bet        ab-dot-noun ;
bc        ab-dot ;  !bc. 30-42
dmu        ab-nodot ; !diibmu
enr        ab-noun ;
kap:kap9    ab-nodot-noun ;                           !
mob:mob9        ab-noun ;
rieg        ab-dot-IVprfprc ; !riegádan
rievd        ab-dot ;
LEXICON TRAB                  
avd        ab-dot-noun ;              !
b        ab ; ! trab both in 12. b. 2001 and in "lea miessemánu 30. b. mearidán..."
Bj        ab-dot ;              !Bjørn, Bjarne
bbl        ab-noun ;          !Bargobirašláhka
dhj    ab-dot ; !dahje
dir              ab-dot-noun ;             !direktevra
e.e              ab-dot-adv ;                            !
ee              ab-adv ;                                !
eren              ab-dot-adj ;                            !
ex              ab ;                                    !
eŋg              ab-dot-noun-adj;                        !
Gnr ab-dot-noun ;
geas    ab-nodot-noun ;
geahč          ab-verb ; !Must accept no-dot
gč              ab-verb ; ! XXX accept no-dot (?)       !
H.K.H    ab-dot ;              !Hans/hennes kongelige høyhet
lic          ab-dot-noun ;                     !
lnr          ab-dot ;                     !
Luk        ab-noun ;             !Lukas
mies    ab-nodot-noun ;                              !
milj          ab-dot-num ;             !
ng          ab-dot ;                     !
o.m.d      ab-dot-adv ;                 !
Od.prp        ab-dot-noun ;          !Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
omd          ab-dot-adv ;                 !
omd:omd9      ab-nodot-adv ;           !
Ot.prp.nr    ab-noun ;              !Odelstingsproposisjon nummer
overs          ab-dot ;                 !oversatt, oversetter
ođđj        ab-nodot-noun ;
pharm      ab-dot-adj ;                 !
polit          ab-dot-adj ;             !
priv          ab-dot-adj ;             !
psyk          ab-dot-adj ;             !
r          ab-dot-IVprfprc ; !+None           !riegadan
resipr              ab-dot-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
sb          ab-dot-noun ;
Sd           ab-noun ;                  !
sos               ab-dot-adj ;                      !sosiálalaš
St     ab-noun ;                  !
suopm     ab-dot-noun ;                 !
ubm          ab-dot ;                     !ubmesámegiella
vrd          ab-dot-verb ;                !
vrd:vrd9      ab-nodot-verb ; !veardit !
Vrd:Vrd9    ab-nodot ;        !
vs          ab-dot-cc ;                  !
C    ab-noun ; !^C^
G    ab-noun ; !^C^
K    ab-noun ; !^C^
O    ab-noun ; !^C^
S    ab-noun ; !^C^
W    ab-noun ; !^C^
Æ    ab-noun ; !^C^
Ö    ab-noun ; !^C^
